Utah statutes.
23-16-3.2.   Mitigation review panel.

(1)  A mitigation review panel may be convened to review the depredation mitigation plans.

(2)  Membership of the mitigation review panel shall consist of:

(a)  the division director or the director's designee;

(b) (i)  the commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food or the commissioner's designee; or

(ii)  a representative of agricultural interests appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food; and

(c)  a representative of Utah State University Extension Service appointed by the Vice President and Dean for University Extension.

(3) (a)  The division director shall convene a mitigation review panel if:

(i)  a landowner or lessee appeals a depredation mitigation plan under Subsection 23-16-3.1(2)(b)(ii); or

(ii)  the division director requests review of a depredation mitigation plan.

(b)  Within five business days of an appeal under Subsection 23-16-3.1(2)(b)(ii) or a division request for review under Subsection 23-16-3.1(3)(b), the mitigation review panel shall review the depredation mitigation plan and approve or modify the plan.

(4)  Judicial review of a mitigation review panel action shall be governed by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

